Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STATE RESPONSIBILITY FOR OLD WILLIAMS SCHOOL PROPERTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or any other law to the contrary, Lake of the Woods County is not responsible for managing the property known as the Old Williams School site. The commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency, is responsible for maintaining and using the property. new text end new text begin (b) By February 1, 2026, the commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency, must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment policy and finance on options for cleaning up, maintaining, and using the Old Williams School site. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end